Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2333.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 14-ARESPONSIBLE UTILITY CUSTOMER PROTECTIONSec.1401-A. Scope of chapter.1402-A. Declaration of policy.1403-A. Definitions.1404-A. Cash deposits and household information requirements.1404.1-A. Security deposits.1405-A. Payment arrangements.1406-A. Termination of utility service.1234567891011121314151617 1407-A. Reconnection of service.1408-A. Surcharges for uncollectible expenses.1409-A. Late payment charge waiver.1410-A. Complaints filed with commission.1410.1-A. Public utility duties.1411-A. Automatic meter readings.1412-A. Reporting of delinquent customers. (RESERVED). 1413-A. Reporting of recipients of public assistance.1414-A. Liens by city natural gas distribution operations.1415-A. Reporting to General Assembly and Governor.1416-A. Notice.1417-A. Nonapplicability.1418-A. Construction.1419-A. Expiration.§ 1401-A. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to protecting responsible customers of public utilities.§ 1402-A. Declaration of policy.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Formal service rules were first adopted by the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission in 1978 with the stated goal of enforcing uniform, fair and equitable residential utility service standards governing eligibility criteria, credit and deposit practices, account billing, termination and restoration of service procedures and customer complaint procedures. These rules have not successfully managed the issue of bill payment. Increasing amounts of unpaid bills now threaten paying customers with higher rates due to other customers' delinquencies.(2) It is now time to revisit these rules and provide 20260HB2333PN3196 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 protections against rate increases for timely paying customers resulting from other customers' delinquencies. Greater equity can be achieved by eliminating opportunities for customers capable of paying to avoid the timely payment of public utility bills.(3) This chapter provides public utilities with an equitable means to reduce their uncollectible accounts by modifying the procedures for delinquent account collections and by increasing timely collections. At the same time, service should remain available to all customers on reasonable terms and conditions.(4) It is appropriate to provide additional collection tools to city natural gas distribution operations to recognize the financial circumstances of the operations and protect their ability to provide natural gas for the benefit of the residents of the city.(5) It is appropriate to recognize the applicability of this chapter to a water and sewer authority in a city of the second class.§ 1403-A. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." An individual who is at least 18 years of age or an emancipated minor, who is not currently receiving service and who applies for residential service provided by a public utility or any adult occupant whose name appears on the mortgage, deed or lease as specified under section 202 of the act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951, of the property for which the residential 20260HB2333PN3196 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 public utility service is requested. The term does not include an individual who, not later than 30 days after service termination or discontinuance of service, seeks to have service reconnected at the same location or transferred to another location within the service territory of the public utility."Change in income." A decrease in household income of:(1) 10% or more if the customer's household income level exceeds 300% of the Federal poverty level; or(2) 5% or more if the customer's household income level is below 300% of the Federal poverty level."Creditworthiness." An assessment of an applicant's or customer's ability to meet bill payment obligations for utility service."Customer." An individual who is at least 18 years of age or an emancipated minor whose name a residential service account is listed and who is primarily responsible for payment of bills rendered for the service or any adult occupant whose name appears on the mortgage, deed or lease as specified under section 202 of The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951, of the property for which the residential utility service is requested. The term includes an individual who, not later than 30 days after service termination or discontinuance of service, seeks to have service reconnected at the same location or transferred to another location within the service territory of the public utility."Customer assistance program." A plan or program sponsored by a public utility for the purpose of providing universal service and energy conservation, as defined by section 2202 (relating to definitions) or 2803 (relating to definitions), or other assistance programs offered by a public utility, including 20260HB2333PN3196 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a water distribution utility or wastewater utility, in which customers make monthly payments based on household income and household size and under which customers must comply with certain responsibilities and restrictions in order to remain eligible for the program."Electric distribution utility." The term shall have the same meaning as the term "electric distribution company" under section 2803."Formal complaint." A complaint filed with the commission requesting a legal proceeding before a commission administrative law judge or a mediation under the management of a commission administrative law judge."Household income." The combined gross income of all adults at least 18 years of age and emancipated minors in a residential household who benefit from the public utility service, excluding earned and unearned income received by household members who are younger than 18 years of age and not emancipated."Informal complaint." A complaint filed with the commission by a customer that does not involve a legal proceeding before a commission administrative law judge or a mediation under the management of a commission administrative law judge."LIHEAP" or "Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program." A federally funded program authorized by 42 U.S.C. §§ 862 1 (relating to home energy grants), 8622 (relating to definitions), 8623 (relating to state allotments), 8624 (relating to applications and requirements), 8625 (relating to nondiscrimination provisions), 8626 (relating to payments to States; fiscal year requirements respecting availability, etc.), 8627 (relating to withholding of funds), 8628 (relating to limitation on use of grants for construction), 8629 (relating to 20260HB2333PN3196 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 studies and reports) and 8630 (relating to renewable fuels) that provides financial assistance in the form of cash and crisis grants to low-income households for home energy bills and is administered by the Department of Human Services."Medical certificate." A written document, in a form approved by the commission:(1) certifying that a customer or member of the customer's household is seriously ill or has been diagnosed with a medical condition requiring the continuation of service to treat the medical condition; and(2) signed by a licensed physician, nurse practitioner or physician's assistant. For the purposes of this paragraph, a medical certificate may be renewed by a registered nurse if previously signed by a licensed physician, nurse practitioner or physician's assistant and attested to by the registered nurse."Natural gas distribution service." The term shall mean the same as defined under section 2202."Natural gas distribution utility." The term shall have the same meaning as the term "natural gas distribution company" as defined under section 2202."Natural gas supply services." The term shall mean the same as defined under section 2202."Occupant." (Reserved)."Payment arrangement." An agreement in which a customer or applicant, who admits liability for billed service, is permitted to amortize or pay the unpaid balance of the account in one or more payments."Public utility." An electric distribution utility, natural gas distribution utility, small natural gas distribution 20260HB2333PN3196 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 utility, steam heat utility, wastewater utility or water distribution utility in this Commonwealth that is within the jurisdiction of the commission. The term includes a city natural gas distribution operation and a water and sewer authority in a city of the second class."Significant change in circumstance." Any of the following criteria if verified by a public utility and experienced by a customer with household income less than 300% of the Federal poverty level:(1) Change in income.(2) The onset of a chronic or acute illness.(3) Damage to the customer's residence resulting in a significant net cost to the customer's household.(4) Loss of the customer's residence.(5) Increase in the customer's number of dependents in the household.(6) Any other circumstance to be considered in the commission's discretion, including a change in employment status, death, injury, divorce, separation or other substantial hardship."Small natural gas distribution utility." A public utility providing natural gas distribution services subject to the jurisdiction of the commission that:(1) has annual gas operating revenues of less than $6,000,000 per year; or(2) is not connected to an interstate gas pipeline by means of a direct connection or an indirect connection through the distribution system of another natural gas public utility or through a natural gas gathering system."Steam heat utility." An entity producing, generating, 20260HB2333PN3196 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 distributing or furnishing steam for the production of heat or to or for the public for compensation."Wastewater utility." An entity owning or operating equipment or facilities for the collection, treatment or disposal of sewage to or for the public for compensation. The term includes a separate company that individually provides water or wastewater service if the separate company is wholly owned by a common parent company."Water distribution utility." An entity owning or operating equipment or facilities for diverting, developing, pumping, impounding, distributing or furnishing water to or for the public for compensation.§ 1404-A. Cash deposits and household information requirements.(a) Cash deposits.--Except as provided under section 1404.1-A (relating to security deposits), the commission may not prohibit a public utility from requiring a cash deposit, payable during a 90-day period in accordance with commission regulations, in an amount that is equal to one-twelfth of the applicant's estimated annual bill, at the time the public utility determines a deposit is required, from the following:(1) An applicant who previously received utility distribution services and was a customer of the public utility and whose service was terminated for any of the following reasons:(i) Nonpayment of an undisputed delinquent account.(ii) Failure to complete payment of a deposit, provide a guarantee or establish credit.(iii) Failure to permit access to meters, service connections or other property of the public utility for the purpose of replacement, maintenance, repair or meter 20260HB2333PN3196 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reading.(iv) Unauthorized use of the utility service delivered on or about the affected dwelling.(v) Failure to comply with the material terms of a settlement or payment arrangement.(vi) Fraud or material misrepresentation of identity for the purpose of obtaining utility service.(vii) Tampering with meters, including bypassing a meter or removal of an automatic meter reading device or other public utility equipment.(viii) Violating tariff provisions on file with the commission so as to endanger the safety of a person or the integrity of the delivery system of the public utility.(2) An applicant or customer who is unable to establish creditworthiness to the satisfaction of the public utility through the use of a generally accepted credit scoring methodology, as provided in a commission-approved tariff, that employs standards for using the methodology that fall within the range of general industry practice.(3) A customer who fails to comply with a material term or condition of a settlement or payment arrangement.(b) Third-party guarantor.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude an applicant from furnishing a third-party guarantor in lieu of a cash deposit. The guaranty shall be in writing and state the terms of the guaranty. The guarantor shall be responsible for all missed payments owed to the public utility.(c) Deposit hold period.--(1) A public utility may hold a deposit until a timely 20260HB2333PN3196 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 payment history is established. If, after collection of a deposit, a public utility obtains information indicating that a cash deposit is prohibited under Section 1404.1-A, the public utility shall return the deposit to the customer or applicant by the next billing cycle, including any interest accrued on the deposit subject to the provisions of paragraph (3).(2) A timely payment history is established when a customer has paid in full and on time for at least 12 consecutive months.(3) At the end of the deposit holding period as established under paragraph (1), the public utility shall deduct the outstanding balance from the deposit and return or credit any positive difference to the customer. The decision about whether the deposit is returned to the customer or credited on the customer's account belongs to the customer.(4) If service is terminated before the end of the deposit holding period as established under paragraph (1), the public utility shall deduct the outstanding balance from the deposit and return any positive difference to the customer not later than 60 days after the termination.(5) If a customer becomes delinquent before the end of the deposit holding period as established under paragraph (1), the public utility may deduct the outstanding balance from the deposit.(6) The public utility shall accrue interest on the deposit until it is returned or credited as follows:(i) Interest shall be computed at the simple annual interest rate determined by the Secretary of Revenue for 20260HB2333PN3196 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 interest on the underpayment of tax under section 806 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code.(ii) The interest rate in effect when deposit is required to be paid shall remain in effect until the later of:(A) the date the deposit is refunded or credited; or(B) December 31.(iii) On January 1 of each year, the new interest rate for that year shall apply to the deposit.(d) Adult occupants.--Prior to providing utility service, a public utility may require the applicant to provide the names of each adult occupant residing at the location and proof of their identity.(e) Failure to pay full amount of cash deposit.--A public utility is not required to provide service to an applicant or customer if the applicant or customer fails to pay the full amount of the cash deposit within the time period under subsection (a).(f) City natural gas distribution operation and additional deposit rules for city natural gas distribution operations.--Except for an applicant who is subject to a deposit under subsection (a), a city natural gas distribution operation may require a deposit from an applicant as follows:(1) if the applicant has household income above 300% of the Federal poverty level, one-sixth of the applicant's estimated annual bill shall be paid in full at the time the city natural gas distribution operation determines a deposit is required; or20260HB2333PN3196 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) if the applicant has household income no greater than 300% of the Federal poverty level, one-twelfth of the applicant's estimated annual bill shall be paid in full at the time the city natural gas distribution operation determines a deposit is required. This paragraph does not apply if the applicant enrolls into the customer assistance program made available by the city natural gas distribution operation.(g) Estimated annual bill.--For purposes of this section, an estimated annual bill shall be calculated on the basis of the annual bill to the dwelling at which service is being requested for the prior 12 months or, if unavailable, a similar dwelling in close proximity.(h) Time for paying deposits upon reconnection.--An applicant or customer required to pay a deposit upon reconnection under subsection (a)(1) shall have up to 90 days to pay the deposit in accordance with commission regulations.§ 1404.1-A. Security deposits.Notwithstanding any other provision of law or commission regulation, a public utility may not require a cash deposit as a condition for an applicant or customer to obtain or continue public utility service if the household income of the applicant or customer is at or below 300% of the Federal poverty level.§ 1405-A. Payment arrangements.(a) Commission authorized.--The commission may investigate complaints regarding payment disputes between a public utility, applicants and customers. The commission may establish payment arrangements between a public utility, customers and applicants within the limits established by this chapter.(b) Length of payment arrangements.--Except as provided 20260HB2333PN3196 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under subsection (b.1), the length of time for a customer to resolve an unpaid balance on an account that is subject to a payment arrangement that is investigated by the commission and is entered into by a public utility and a customer may not extend beyond:(1) Six years, if the customer has a gross monthly household income level not exceeding 150% of the Federal poverty level.(2) Four years, if the customer has a gross monthly household income level exceeding 150% and not more than 250% of the Federal poverty level.(3) Two years, if the customer has a gross monthly household income level exceeding 250% of the Federal poverty level and not more than 300% of the Federal poverty level.(4) One year, if the customer has a gross monthly household income level exceeding 300% of the Federal poverty level.(b.1) Alternative payment arrangement.--If a customer's income level is not more than 300% of the Federal poverty level and the customer's monthly payment would exceed 20% of the customer's average monthly bill based on the length of the payment arrangement for the customer under subsection (b), the commission shall extend the length of the payment arrangement for the customer so that the monthly payment does not exceed 20% of the customer's average monthly bill, not to exceed two times the length of the payment arrangement for the customer under subsection (b).(c) Customer assistance programs.--(1) Customer assistance program rates shall be timely paid and are not subject to commission-issued payment 20260HB2333PN3196 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 arrangements while the customer is enrolled in a customer assistance program. The commission may issue a payment arrangement if a customer is not enrolled in a customer assistance program even if the customer has arrears incurred while in the customer assistance program.(2) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit a public utility from entering a payment arrangement for a customer enrolled in a customer assistance program.(3) This subsection shall not apply to arrearages accrued at full residential tariff rates by a customer enrolled in a customer assistance program.(d) Number of payment arrangements.--(1) Absent a change in income or a significant change in circumstances, the commission may not establish or order a public utility to establish a second or subsequent payment arrangement if a customer has defaulted on a previous payment arrangement established by a commission order or decision.(2) A public utility shall enter into a subsequent payment arrangement with a customer whose gross monthly income is less than 300% of the Federal poverty level.(3) A public utility may, at its discretion, enter into a second or subsequent payment arrangement with a customer.(e) Extension of payment arrangements.--If the customer defaults on a payment arrangement established under subsections (a) and (b) as a result of a significant change in circumstance, the commission may reinstate the payment arrangement and extend the remaining term for an initial period of six months. The initial extension period may be extended for an additional six months for good cause shown.(f) Failure to comply with payment arrangement.--Failure of 20260HB2333PN3196 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a customer to comply with the terms of a payment arrangement shall be grounds for a public utility to terminate the customer's service. Pending the outcome of a complaint filed with the commission, the customer shall be obligated to pay that portion of the bill that is not in dispute and subsequent bills that are not in dispute.§ 1406-A. Termination of utility service.(a) Authorized termination.--A public utility may notify a customer and terminate service provided to a customer after notice as provided in subsection (b) for any of the following actions by the customer:(1) Nonpayment of an undisputed delinquent account.(2) Failure to comply with the material terms of a payment arrangement.(3) Failure to complete payment of a deposit, provide a guarantee of payment or establish credit.(4) Failure to permit access to meters, service connections or other property of the public utility for the purpose of replacement, maintenance, repair or meter reading.(b) Notice of termination of service.--(1) Prior to terminating service under subsection (a), a public utility shall:(i) Provide written notice of the termination to the customer at least 20 days prior to the date of the proposed termination. The termination notice shall remain effective for 70 days. The public utility shall mail the written termination notice via first class mail to the customer and provide the termination notice by electronic means if the customer affirmatively and appropriately consents to receive the termination notice by electronic 20260HB2333PN3196 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 means and the public utility has the capability to provide the termination notice by electronic means. The public utility may provide the termination notice by electronic means by either email or text message or both email and text message if the customer affirmatively and appropriately consents.(ii) Attempt to contact the customer or occupant to provide notice of the proposed termination at least three days prior to the scheduled termination, using one or more of the following methods:(A) In person.(B) By telephone. Phone contact shall be deemed complete upon attempted calls on two separate days to the residence between the hours of 8 a.m. and 9 p.m. if the calls are made at various times each day. The public utility shall biannually update customer contact information and preferences for telephone notification under this clause.(C) By email, text message or other electronic messaging format consistent with the commission's privacy guidelines and approved by commission order. The public utility shall biannually update customer contact information and preferences for electronic notification under this clause. In the case of electronic notification only, the customer must affirmatively consent to be contacted using a specific electronic messaging format for purpose of termination.(iii) During the months of December through March, unless personal contact has been made with the customer 20260HB2333PN3196 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or responsible adult who is at least 18 years of age or an emancipated minor by personally visiting the customer's residence, within 48 hours of the scheduled date of termination, post a notice of the proposed termination at the service location in a conspicuous location.(iv) After complying with subparagraphs (ii) and (iii), at the time service is terminated, post the termination notice at the service location in a conspicuous location. Termination of service may not be delayed for failure to make personal contact.(2) The commission may not require the public utility to take any additional actions prior to termination.(c) Grounds for immediate termination.--(1) A public utility may immediately terminate service for any of the following actions by the customer:(i) Unauthorized use of the service delivered on or about the affected dwelling.(ii) Fraud or material misrepresentation of the customer's identity for the purpose of obtaining service.(iii) Tampering with meters or other public utility equipment.(iv) Violating tariff provisions on file with the commission so as to endanger the safety of a person or the integrity of the public utility's delivery system.(v) Tendering payment for reconnection of service that is subsequently dishonored, revoked, canceled or otherwise not authorized under subsection (h) and that has not been cured or otherwise made full payment within three business days of the public utility's notice to the 20260HB2333PN3196 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 customer, made in accordance with the notice provisions of subsection (b)(1)(ii), of the dishonored payment.(2) Upon termination, the public utility shall make a good faith attempt to provide a post-termination notice to the customer or a responsible person at the affected premises, and, in the case of a single meter, multiunit dwelling, the public utility shall conspicuously post the notice at the dwelling, including in common areas if possible.(d) Timing of termination.--Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1503 (relating to discontinuance of service), a public utility may terminate service for the reasons under subsection (a) from Monday through Thursday as long as the public utility is able to accept payment to restore service on the following day and restore service consistent with section 1407-A (relating to reconnection of service). A public utility may not terminate service on a Friday, a Federal or State holiday or the business day immediately preceding a Federal or State holiday.(e) Winter EXTREME WEATHER termination.-- (1) Unless otherwise authorized by the commission, after November 30 and before April 1, a public utility may not terminate service to customers with household incomes at or below 250% of the Federal poverty level except for customers whose actions conform to subsection (c)(1). The commission may not prohibit a public utility from terminating service in accordance with this section to customers with household incomes exceeding 250% of the Federal poverty level.(2) In addition to the winter EXTREME WEATHER termination authority under paragraph (1) OR (4) , a city 20260HB2333PN3196 - 18 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 natural gas distribution operation may terminate service to a customer whose household income exceeds 150% of the Federal poverty level but does not exceed 250% of the Federal poverty level, and starting January 1, has not paid at least 50% of the charges for each of the prior two months, unless the customer has:(i) proven in accordance with commission rules that the household contains one or more persons who are 65 years of age or over;(ii) proven in accordance with commission rules that the household contains one or more persons 12 years of age or younger;(iii) obtained a medical certification in accordance with commission rules; or(iv) paid to the city natural gas distribution operation an amount representing at least 15% of the customer's monthly household income for each of the last two months.(3) At the time that the notice of termination required by subsection (b)(1)(i) is provided to the customer, the city natural gas distribution operation shall provide notice to the commission. The commission may not stay the termination of service unless the commission finds that the customer satisfies paragraph (2).(4) UNLESS OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED BY THE COMMISSION, AFTER JUNE 30 AND BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, A PUBLIC UTILITY MAY NOT TERMINATE ELECTRIC SERVICE TO CUSTOMERS WITH HOUSEHOLD INCOMES AT OR BELOW 250% OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY LEVEL EXCEPT FOR CUSTOMERS WHOSE ACTIONS CONFORM TO SUBSECTION (C)(1). THE COMMISSION MAY NOT PROHIBIT A PUBLIC UTILITY FROM TERMINATING 20260HB2333PN3196 - 19 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ELECTRIC SERVICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION TO CUSTOMERS WITH HOUSEHOLD INCOMES EXCEEDING 250% OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY LEVEL.(5) UNLESS OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED BY THE COMMISSION, A PUBLIC UTILITY MAY NOT TERMINATE SERVICE TO A CUSTOMER IN A COUNTY ON A DAY FOR WHICH THE NATIONAL WEATHER SERVICE HAS ISSUED A WINTER STORM WARNING, EXTREME COLD WARNING, FREEZE WARNING, COLD WEATHER ADVISORY, EXTREME HEAT WATCH, EXTREME HEAT WARNING, HEAT ADVISORY OR A SIMILAR TEMPERATURE-BASED WARNING FOR THE COUNTY.(6) UNLESS OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED BY THE COMMISSION, A PUBLIC UTILITY MAY NOT TERMINATE SERVICE TO A CUSTOMER WHO IS OTHERWISE ELIGIBLE FOR LIHEAP DURING A FEDERAL GOVERNMENT SHUTDOWN THAT DELAYS THE ANTICIPATED DISBURSEMENT OF LIHEAP FUNDING.(f) Medical certification.--A public utility may not terminate service to a premises when a customer has submitted a medical certificate to the public utility. The customer must obtain a medical certificate verifying the condition and promptly forward it to the public utility. The medical certification procedure shall be implemented in accordance with commission regulations and:(1) Service may not be terminated for the time period specified in a medical certification. The maximum length of a medical certification shall be 60 days.(2) A medical certification may be renewed in the same manner and for the same time period in accordance with this subsection in accordance with the policy of the commission.(g) Qualification for utility assistance.--A notice of termination to a customer of a public utility shall be 20260HB2333PN3196 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sufficient proof of a crisis for a customer with the requisite income level to receive a LIHEAP crisis grant or utility assistance from the Department of Human Services or its designee as soon as practicable after the date of the notice. Termination of service is not necessary to demonstrate sufficient proof of crisis.(h) Dishonorable tender of payment after receiving termination notice.--(1) After a public utility has provided a written termination notice under subsection (b)(1)(i), attempted contact as provided in subsection (b)(1)(ii) and posted the termination notice at the service location in a conspicuous location as provided for under subsection (b)(1)(iv), termination of service may proceed without additional notice if:(i) the customer tenders payment that is subsequently dishonored under 13 Pa.C.S. § 3502 (relating to dishonor);(ii) the customer tenders payment with an access device, as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 4106(d) (relating to access device fraud), that is unauthorized, revoked or canceled; or(iii) the customer tenders payment electronically that is subsequently dishonored, revoked, canceled or is otherwise not authorized and that has not been cured or otherwise made full payment within three business days of the public utility's notice to the customer, made in accordance with the notice provisions of subsection (b)(1)(ii), of the dishonored payment.(2) The commission may not require the public utility to 20260HB2333PN3196 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 take any additional actions prior to the termination.(i) Language access.--(1) A public utility shall provide a written notice of termination to a customer under this section in English and Spanish.(2) A public utility shall post a fully translated copy of a written notice of termination under this section and a description of the public utility's termination process in English and Spanish, along with the five most commonly spoken languages in the public utility's service territory, in a conspicuous location on the public utility's publicly accessible Internet website.§ 1407-A. Reconnection of service.(a) Fee.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (1) or (2), a public utility may require a reconnection fee based upon the public utility's cost as approved by the commission prior to reconnection of service following lawful termination of the service. A public utility shall inform applicants and customers of the prohibition on reconnection fees specified in this subsection at the time a reconnection fee is assessed and provide the household with the opportunity to demonstrate that they are exempt under this provision.(2) If a customer's income level is at or below 250% of the Federal poverty level, the public utility may not require payment of reconnection fees as a condition of reconnection.(3) If a customer's income level is above 250% but below 400% of the Federal poverty level, the reconnection fee shall be included in the customer's arrearages.(b) Timing.--If service to a dwelling has been terminated 20260HB2333PN3196 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and provided the customer or applicant has met all applicable conditions, the public utility shall reconnect service as follows:(1) Within 24 hours for erroneous terminations or upon receipt by the public utility of a valid medical certification.(2) Within 24 hours for terminations occurring after November 30 and before April 1.(3) WITHIN 24 HOURS FOR TERMINATIONS OCCURRING AFTER JUNE 30 AND BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1 IN VIOLATION OF SECTION 1406-A(E)(4) (RELATING TO TERMINATION OF UTILITY SERVICE) OR TERMINATIONS OCCURRING IN VIOLATION OF SECTION 1406-A(E)(5) OR (6).(3) (4) Within three days for erroneous terminations requiring street or sidewalk digging.(4) (5) Within three days from April 1 to November 30 for proper terminations.(5) (6) Within seven days for proper terminations requiring street or sidewalk digging.(c) Payment to restore service.--(1) A public utility shall provide for and inform the customer or applicant of a location where the customer may make payment to restore service.(2) A public utility may require:(i) Full payment of any outstanding balance incurred together with any reconnection fees by the customer or applicant prior to reconnection of service if the customer or applicant has an income exceeding 300% of the Federal poverty level or has defaulted on two or more payment arrangements. If a customer or applicant with 20260HB2333PN3196 - 23 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 household income exceeding 300% of the Federal poverty level experiences a significant change of circumstances, the customer shall be permitted a period of not more than three months to pay the outstanding balance required for reconnection.(ii) Repayment over 12 months of any outstanding balance incurred by the customer or applicant if the customer or applicant has an income exceeding 150% of the Federal poverty level but not greater than 300% of the Federal poverty level.(iii) Full payment of any reconnection fees together with payment over 24 months of any outstanding balance incurred by the customer or applicant if the customer or applicant has an income not exceeding 150% of the Federal poverty level. A customer or applicant of a city natural gas distribution operation whose household income does not exceed 135% of the Federal poverty level shall be reinstated according to this subsection only if the customer or applicant enrolls in the customer assistance program of the city natural gas distribution operation, except that this requirement does not apply if the financial benefits to the customer or applicant are greater if served outside of the assistance program.(iv) A customer or applicant who is eligible for the public utility's customer assistance program shall be permitted to reconnect to services through enrollment in the public utility's customer assistance program, without any up-front payment of arrears.(3) Payment tendered by a customer to reconnect service that is subsequently dishonored, revoked, canceled or is 20260HB2333PN3196 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 otherwise not authorized under section 1406-A(h)(1) (relating to termination of utility service) and has not been cured or otherwise made full payment within three business days of the public utility's notice to the customer or applicant, made in accordance with the notice provisions of section 1406-A(b)(1)(ii), of the dishonored payment is grounds for immediate termination under section 1406-A(c). A public utility may require a customer or applicant to cure a dishonored payment, as provided for in section 1406-A(h), as a condition of entering into a payment agreement with the customer or applicant for a remaining account balance.(d) Payment of outstanding balance at premises.--A public utility may require the payment of any outstanding balance or portion of an outstanding balance if the applicant resided at the property for which service is requested during the time the outstanding balance accrued and for the time the applicant resided there.(e) Approval.--A public utility may establish that an applicant previously resided at a property for which residential service is requested through the use of mortgage, deed or lease as specified under section 202 of the act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951, a commercially available consumer credit reporting service or other methods approved as valid by the commission.§ 1408-A. Surcharges for uncollectible expenses.(a) Prohibition.--The commission may not grant or order for a public utility a cash receipts reconciliation clause or another automatic surcharge mechanism for uncollectible expenses. An order by the commission entered after the effective date of this subsection for a cash receipts reconciliation 20260HB2333PN3196 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 clause or other automatic surcharge for uncollectible expenses shall be null and void.(b) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect any clause associated with universal service and energy conservation.§ 1409-A. Late payment charge waiver.A public utility shall waive late payment charges on any customer accounts if the charges were improperly assessed. The commission may order a waiver of any late payment charges levied by a public utility as a result of a delinquent account for customers with a gross monthly household income not exceeding 150% of the Federal poverty level.§ 1410-A. Complaints filed with commission.The following apply to complaints filed with the commission:(1) The commission shall accept formal and informal complaints only from a customer or applicant who affirms that the customer or applicant first made a good faith attempt to contact the public utility for the purpose of resolving the problem about which the customer or applicant wishes to file a complaint. If the customer or applicant has not made a good faith attempt to contact the public utility, the commission shall direct the customer or applicant to the public utility.(2) Pending the outcome of a formal or informal complaint filed with the commission, the customer or applicant shall pay that portion of the bill that is not in dispute and subsequent bills that are not in dispute.(3) For a formal complaint filing to be valid, the customer or applicant must provide a statement attesting to the truth as to the facts alleged in the complaint. All testimony in formal complaint proceedings must be under oath.20260HB2333PN3196 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 1410.1-A. Public utility duties.(a) Payment agreements.--A public utility shall take the action described in subsection (b) if:(1) a customer or applicant contacts the public utility to make a payment agreement as required by section 1410-A (relating to complaints filed with commission);(2) the public utility has information that would reasonably lead the public utility to conclude that a customer or applicant is or was payment troubled; or(3) the public utility receives information that a customer's or applicant's household may qualify the customer for a universal service and energy conservation program.(b) Duties owed to customer or applicant.--The public utility shall:(1) Provide information about the public utility's universal service programs, including a customer assistance program.(2) Refer the customer or applicant to the universal service program administrator of the public utility to determine eligibility for a program and to apply for enrollment in a program.(3) Have an affirmative responsibility to attempt to collect payment on an overdue account.(4) Report to the commission on an annual basis the number of medical certificates and renewals submitted and accepted in the service territory.(c) Other duties.--The public utility shall:(1) Screen a customer or applicant to determine if the customer or applicant's household income is at or below 300% of the Federal poverty level at the time service is 20260HB2333PN3196 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 established and on a biannual basis thereafter. The public utility shall attempt to update the income information under this paragraph at least once per year.(2) Contact a customer or applicant with arrearages over 90 days past due to offer payment arrangements, referrals and other resources for which the customer or applicant may be eligible.(3) Annually report to the commission residential customer accounts that have accumulated $10,000 or more in arrearages. Failure to make reasonable attempts to collect payments on overdue accounts with arrearages in excess of $10,000 may result in civil fines or other appropriate sanctions by the commission.§ 1411-A. Automatic meter readings.All readings by an automatic meter reader device shall be deemed actual readings for the purposes of this title. Upon a customer request, the public utility shall secure an in-person meter reading to confirm the accuracy of an automatic meter reading device when a customer disconnects service or a new service request is received. A public utility may charge a fee, as provided in a commission-approved tariff.§ 1412-A. Reporting of delinquent customers.A city natural gas distribution operation shall report to the Pennsylvania Intergovernmental Cooperation Authority established pursuant to the act of June 5, 1991 (P.L.9, No.6), known as the Pennsylvania Intergovernmental Cooperation Authority Act for Cities of the First Class, an assisted city or corporate entity of an assisted city, as those terms are defined in the Pennsylvania Intergovernmental Cooperation Authority Act, that has not paid in full for charges for service by the due dates 20260HB2333PN3196 - 28 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 stated on the bill or otherwise agreed upon.§ 1412-A. (RESERVED).§ 1413-A. Reporting of recipients of public assistance.The Department of Human Services shall annually make available to each public utility with a signed LIHEAP vendor agreement a listing of recipients of LIHEAP or any other utility assistance administered by the Department of Human Services. A public utility may not use the listing for anything but qualification and continued eligibility for a customer assistance program or LIHEAP.§ 1414-A. Liens by city natural gas distribution operations.(a) Liens generally.--A city natural gas distribution operation furnishing gas service to a property may impose or assess a municipal claim against the property and file as liens of record claims for unpaid natural gas distribution service and other related costs, including natural gas supply services, in:(1) the court of common pleas of the county in which the property is situated; or(2) if the claim for the unpaid natural gas distribution service does not exceed the maximum amount over which the Municipal Court of Philadelphia has jurisdiction, in the Municipal Court of Philadelphia, pursuant to sections 3 and 9 of the act of May 16, 1923 (P.L.207, No.153), referred to as the Municipal Claim and Tax Lien Law, and Chapter 22 (relating to natural gas competition).(b) Residential field visit charge.--A city natural gas distribution operation may charge a minimum fee of $10 for each instance in which its representative is required to visit the residence of a customer in the process of attempting to complete required service termination steps.20260HB2333PN3196 - 29 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Refusal of service.--The commission shall permit a city natural gas distribution operation to refuse to provide service to an applicant if the applicant has a pending lien or civil judgment by the city natural gas distribution operation outstanding against the applicant or against property owned in whole or in part by the applicant, unless the applicant enters into a payment arrangement for the payment of the amount associated with the lien or judgment that remains outstanding at the time of the application.§ 1415-A. Reporting to General Assembly and Governor.(a) Report.--No later than five years following the effective date of this subsection and every five years thereafter, the commission shall submit a report to the Governor, the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives and the Secretary of the Senate reviewing the implementation of the provisions of this chapter. The report shall include:(1) The degree to which the chapter's requirements have been successfully implemented.(2) The effect upon the cash working capital or cash flow, uncollectible levels and collections of the affected public utilities.(3) The level of access to public utility services by residential customers, including low-income customers.(4) The effect upon the level of consumer complaints and mediations filed with and adjudicated by the commission.(b) Data requirements.--Public utilities affected by this chapter shall provide data required by the commission to complete the report under subsection (a).(c) Proposed changes.--In its recommendations, the commission may also propose any legislative or other changes 20260HB2333PN3196 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that the commission deems appropriate.§ 1416-A. Notice.Not later than 30 days after the effective date of this section, public utilities affected by this chapter shall provide notice to their customers explaining the changes to be implemented.§ 1417-A. Nonapplicability.This chapter shall not apply to victims under a protection from abuse order as provided by 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to protection from abuse), a court order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction or a written certification from a domestic violence counselor/advocate as defined under 23 Pa.C.S. § 6102 (relating to definitions) that provides clear evidence of domestic violence against the applicant or customer.§ 1418-A. Construction.Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to affect any rights or procedure under the act of November 26, 1978 (P.L.1255, No.299), known as the Utility Service Tenants Rights Act, or the provisions of Subchapter B of Chapter 15 (relating to discontinuance of service to leased premises).§ 1419-A. Expiration.This chapter shall expire December 31, 2036.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2333PN3196 - 31 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223